es: Protocolos de red compatibles: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Otros
bg-BG: Поддържани мрежови протоколи: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Други
de: Unterstützte Netzwerkprotokolle: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Sonstiges
ro-RO: Protocoale de rețea acceptate: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet; IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Altele
hr-HR: Podržani mrežni protokoli: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Ostalo
pt-BR: Protocolos de rede com suporte: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Outro
sl-SI: Podprti omrežni protokoli: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Drugo
it: Protocolli di rete supportati: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Altro
ja: 対応ネットワークプロトコル: BGP; DHCP; DNS; イーサネット (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); その他
en: Network protocols supported: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Other
ko: 지원되는 네트워크 프로토콜: BGP; DHCP; DNS; 이더넷(IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi(IEEE 802.11); 기타
sk-SK: Podporované sieťové protokoly: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Iné
cs: Podporované síťové protokoly: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Jiné
pl: Obsługiwane protokoły sieciowe: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Inne
el: Υποστηριζόμενα πρωτόκολλα δικτύου: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Άλλο
th: รองรับโปรโตคอลเครือข่าย: BGP; DHCP; DNS; อีเทอร์เน็ต (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); อื่นๆ
tr: Desteklenen Ağ Protokolleri: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Diğer
sv: Kompatibla nätverksprotokoll: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Övrigt
hu: Támogatott hálózati protokollok: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Egyéb
ru: Поддерживаемые сетевые протоколы: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Другое
fr: Protocoles réseau pris en charge: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Autre
pt-PT: Protocolos de rede suportados: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Outro
da: Understøttede netværksprotokoller: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Andet
nl: Ondersteunde netwerkprotocollen: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Andere
lt-LT: Palaikomi tinklo protokolai: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Eternetas (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Kita
nb: Nettverksprotokoller støttes: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Annet
zh-TW: 支援的網路協定: BGP; DHCP; DNS; 乙太網路 (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); 其他
zh-CN: 支持的网络协议: BGP; DHCP; DNS; 以太网 (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; 虚拟局域网; 无线网络 (IEEE 802.11); 其他
vi: Giao thức mạng được hỗ trợ: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Khác
fi: Tuetut verkkoprotokollat: BGP; DHCP; DNS; Ethernet (IEEE 802.3); IGMP; OSPF; PPP; SNMP; STP; TCP/IP; VLAN; Wi-Fi (IEEE 802.11); Muu